Utah statutes.
53-3-1005.   License expiration and renewal -- Fee required -- Disposition of revenue.

(1) (a)  All ignition interlock system provider licenses and installer licenses:

(i)  expire one year from the date of issuance; and

(ii)  may be renewed upon application to the commissioner as prescribed by rule.

(b)  Each application for an original or renewal provider license or installer license shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504.

(c)  A license fee may not be refunded if the license is rejected, suspended, or revoked.

(2)  The license fees collected under this part shall be placed in the Department of Public Safety Restricted Account.

